District of Columbia statutes.
31-3516

Conversion to a mutual company.

A corporation issued a certificate of authority under this chapter shall not be converted into a mutual insurance company.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 17, 44 DCR 1158
Dec. 9, 2003, D.C. Law 15-56, § 3(b), 50 DCR 9188
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-369, § 2(h), 56 DCR 1346

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4716.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-56, in subsec. (b), substituted “company not involving a nonprofit hospital service plan or medical service plan unless” for “company unless”, and added subsec. (b-1).
D.C. Law 17-369 rewrote the section.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-217, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2730).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-457, July 23, 2002, 48 DCR 8132).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-513, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10475).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-8, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1473).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-205, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-257, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 11006).